Washington statutes.
RCW 35.17.150

Officers and employees—Passes, free services prohibited, exceptions—Penalty.

No officer or employee, elected or appointed, shall receive from any enterprise operating under a public franchise any frank, free ticket, or free service or receive any service upon terms more favorable than are granted to the public generally: PROVIDED, That the provisions of this section shall not apply to free transportation furnished to police officers and firefighters in uniform nor to free service to city officials provided for in the franchise itself.

Any violation of the provisions of this section shall be a misdemeanor.

[ 2009 c 549 s 2017; 1965 c 7 s 35.17.150. Prior: 1961 c 268 s 11; prior: 1911 c 116 s 17, part; RRS s 9106, part.]